Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB528.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1506(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1506. Application for driver's license or learner's permit.(a) Form and content.--Every application for a learner's permit or driver's license shall be made upon a form furnished by the department and shall contain such information as the department may require to determine the applicant's identity, competency and eligibility. The form [may] shall also provide for inclusion of personal medical information, next of kin information and other information of use in an emergency[.], but an applicant may not be required to include personal medical information, next of kin information or other information of use 123456789101112131415161718 in an emergency on the form.* * *Section 2. Section 1956 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1956. Certified copies of records.* * *(c) Reports to coroner.--The Office of Administration shall create a uniform process that provides coroners, as defined in 16 Pa.C.S. § 13902 (relating to definitions), acting within their official duties access to the following records and systems in the Pennsylvania Justice Network, or its successor, at no cost:(1) Emergency contact or next of kin information provided by an individual at the time of application under section 1506(a) (relating to application for driver's license or learner's permit).(2) Anatomical organ donor registration status as indicated on an individual's driver's license or identification card as provided under section 1510(c) (relating to issuance and content of driver's license).(3) A color photograph of an individual as depicted on the individual's driver's license or identification card.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0528PN0521 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223